lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/d.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+N +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

nouns ;

LEXICON nouns
boat m ;
cat m ;
dog m ;
sheep m3 ;
ox m2 ;

LEXICON m
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:s # ;

LEXICON m2
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl:en # ;

LEXICON m3
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Pl: # ;
